Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
CHAPTER 121 Campaign Finance Regulation

121.005.
Legislative findings on electronic storage and retrieval of campaign finance information.

The General Assembly finds and declares that:

The intent of disclosure of campaign finance information is to make that information about political contributions and expenditures accessible to the public;

The volume of campaign finance reports submitted each year to the state renders it virtually impossible, without the help of computer technology, to derive meaningful conclusions from the records; and

Computer automation is a necessary and effective means of transmitting, organizing, storing, and retrieving vast amounts of data submitted by candidates in election campaigns.

The General Assembly enacts this legislation to accomplish the following:

To improve the existing system of electronic reporting and extend its usage to more candidates;

To allow concerned persons easy, convenient, and timely access to campaign finance reports submitted to the state;

To ease the burden on candidates and committees of tabulating, filing, and maintaining public records of financial activity;

To strengthen both the disclosure and enforcement capabilities of the Registry of Election Finance;

To cooperate in the standardization of reporting formats among states so that interstate as well as intrastate sources of political money can be known;

To provide for a fully informed electorate; and

To help restore public trust in the governmental and electoral institutions of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2019 ch. 2, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

121.010.
Proclamation
for special election for Governor. [Repealed.]

121.015.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter:

“Registry” means the Kentucky Registry of Election Finance;

“Election” means any primary, regular, or special election to fill vacancies regardless of whether a candidate or slate of candidates is opposed or unopposed in an election. Each primary, regular, or special election shall be considered a separate election;

“Committee” includes the following:

“Campaign committee,” which means one (1) or more persons who receive contributions and make expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more specific candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election to any state, county, city, or district office, but does not include an entity established solely by a candidate which is managed solely by a candidate and a campaign treasurer and whose name is generic in nature, such as “Friends of (the candidate),” and does not reflect that other persons have structured themselves as a committee, designated officers of the committee, and assigned responsibilities and duties to each officer with the purpose of managing a campaign to support or oppose a candidate in an election;

“Caucus campaign committee,” which means members of one (1) of the following caucus groups who receive contributions and make expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more specific candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election, or a committee:

House Democratic caucus campaign committee;

House Republican caucus campaign committee;

Senate Democratic caucus campaign committee;

Senate Republican caucus campaign committee; or

Subdivisions of the state executive committee of a minor political party, which serve the same function as the above-named committees, as determined by regulations promulgated by the registry;

“Political issues committee,” which means three (3) or more persons joining together to advocate or oppose a constitutional amendment or public question which appears on the ballot if that committee receives or expends money in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000);

“Permanent committee,” which means a group of individuals, including an association, committee, or organization, other than a campaign committee, political issues committee, inaugural committee, caucus campaign committee, or party executive committee, which is established as, or intended to be, a permanent organization having as a primary purpose expressly advocating the election or defeat of one (1) or more clearly identified candidates, slates of candidates, or political parties, which functions on a regular basis throughout the year;

An executive committee of a political party; and

“Inaugural committee,” which means one (1) or more persons who receive contributions and make expenditures in support of inauguration activities for any candidate or slate of candidates elected to any state, county, city, or district office;

“Contributing organization” means a group which merely contributes to candidates, slates of candidates, campaign committees, caucus campaign committees, or executive committees from time to time from funds derived solely from within the group, and which does not solicit or receive funds from sources outside the group itself. Any contributions made by the groups in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be reported to the registry;

“Testimonial affair” means an affair held in honor of a person who holds or who is or was a candidate for nomination or election to a political office in this state designed to raise funds for any purpose not charitable, religious, or educational;

“Contribution” means any:

Payment, distribution, loan, deposit, or gift of money or other thing of value, to a candidate, his or her agent, a slate of candidates, its authorized agent, a committee, or contributing organization. As used in this subsection, “loan” shall include a guarantee, endorsement, or other form of security where the risk of nonpayment rests with the surety, guarantor, or endorser, as well as with a committee, contributing organization, candidate, slate of candidates, or other primary obligor. No person shall become liable as surety, endorser, or guarantor for any sum in any one (1) election which, when combined with all other contributions the individual makes to a candidate, his or her agent, a slate of candidates, its agent, a committee, or a contributing organization, exceeds the contribution limits provided in KRS

121.150

;

Payment by any person other than the candidate, his or her authorized treasurer, a slate of candidates, its authorized treasurer, a committee, or a contributing organization, of compensation for the personal services of another person which are rendered to a candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, or for inauguration activities;

Goods, advertising, or services with a value of more than one hundred dollars ($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are furnished to a candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization or for inauguration activities without charge, or at a rate which is less than the rate normally charged for the goods or services; or

Payment by any person other than a candidate, his or her authorized treasurer, a slate of candidates, its authorized treasurer, a committee, or contributing organization for any goods or services with a value of more than one hundred dollars ($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are utilized by a candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, or for inauguration activities;

Notwithstanding the foregoing meanings of “contribution,” the word shall not be construed to include:

Services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a portion or all of their time on behalf of a candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization;

A loan of money by any financial institution doing business in Kentucky made in accordance with applicable banking laws and regulations and in the ordinary course of business; or

An independent expenditure by any individual or permanent committee;

“Candidate” means any person who has received contributions or made expenditures, has appointed a campaign treasurer, or has given his or her consent for any other person to receive contributions or make expenditures with a view to bringing about his or her nomination or election to public office, except federal office;

“Slate of candidates” means:

Between the time a certificate or petition of nomination has been filed for a candidate for the office of Governor under KRS

118.365

and the time the candidate designates a running mate for the office of Lieutenant Governor under KRS

118.126

, a slate of candidates consists of the candidate for the office of Governor; and

After that candidate has designated a running mate under KRS

118.126

, that same slate of candidates consists of that same candidate for the office of Governor and the candidate’s running mate for the office of Lieutenant Governor. Unless the context requires otherwise, any provision of law that applies to a candidate shall also apply to a slate of candidates;

“Knowingly” means, with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a statute defining an offense, that a person is aware or should have been aware that his or her conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists;

“Fundraiser” means an individual who directly solicits and secures contributions on behalf of a candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office or an office in a jurisdiction with a population in excess of two hundred thousand (200,000) residents;

“Independent expenditure” means the expenditure of money or other things of value for a communication which expressly advocates the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or slate of candidates, and which is made without any coordination, consultation, or cooperation with any candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of any of them, and which is not made in concert with, or at the request or suggestion of any candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of any of them;

“Electronic reporting” means the use of technology, having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities, by which an individual or other entity submits, compiles, or transmits campaign finance reports to the registry, or by which the registry receives, stores, analyzes, or discloses the reports;

“Security procedure” means a procedure employed for the purpose of verifying that an electronic signature, record, or performance is that of a specific person or for detecting changes or errors in the information in an electronic record. The term includes a procedure that requires the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying words or numbers, encryption, or callback or other acknowledgment procedures;

“Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record;

“Filer” means any candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, or other individual or entity required to submit financial disclosure reports to the registry;

“Filer-side software” means software provided to or used by the filer that enables transmittal of financial reports to the registry; and

“Form” means an online Web page or an electronic document designed to capture, validate, and submit data for processing to the registry, unless the context otherwise prescribes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 178; 1980, ch. 292, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 100, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 288, § 15, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 458, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 153, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 398, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 105, § 2, effective March 16, 2005; 2008, ch. 129, § 10, effective July 15, 2008; 2018 ch. 4, § 1, effective February 20, 2018; 2020 ch. 88, § 10, effective July 15, 2020; 2022 ch. 208, § 1, effective April 14, 2022.

121.020.
Proclamation
for special election for Representative in Congress. [Repealed.]

121.025.
Corporate contributions to candidates prohibited.

No corporation authorized to do business in this state or in another state, and no officer or agent of a corporation on its behalf, shall contribute, either directly or indirectly, any money, service, or other thing of value towards the nomination or election of any state, county, city, or district officer in this state, or pay, promise, loan, or become liable in any way for any money or other valuable thing on behalf of any candidate for office at any election, primary or nominating convention held in this state. No attorney or other person shall accept employment and compensation from a corporation with the understanding or agreement, either direct or implied, that he or she will contribute to any such candidate, or on his or her behalf, any part or all of such compensation, towards the nomination or election of such candidate. The prohibitions in this section shall not prevent a corporation from making a monetary contribution to a state executive committee’s building fund account established under KRS

121.172

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 179; 1984, ch. 111, § 66, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 458, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 122, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

121.030.
Writ
for special election for member of General Assembly. [Repealed.]

121.035.
Corporate contributions to aid candidates for public office prohibited — Aid to support a constitutional amendment, public issue, or building fund account permitted.

No corporation organized or authorized to do business in this state or in another state shall, by itself or by or through an officer, agent, attorney, or employee, subscribe, give, procure or furnish, or afterwards reimburse or compensate in any way any person who has subscribed, given, procured, or furnished, any money, privilege, favor, or other thing of value to any political or quasi-political organization, or any officer or member thereof, to be used by such organization for the purpose of aiding, assisting, or advancing any candidate for public office in this state in any way whatever.

No officer, agent, attorney, or employee of any corporation organized or authorized to do business in this state or in another state, or person acting for or representing any such corporation, shall disburse, distribute, pay out, or in any way handle any money, funds, or other thing of value that belongs to or has been or is being furnished by any such corporation or any officer, agent, attorney, or employee thereof to be used or employed in any way for the purpose of aiding, assisting, or advancing any candidate for public office in this state in any way whatever.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a corporation from making contributions in support of a constitutional amendment, a public question which appears on the ballot, or position on an issue of public importance, or to prohibit a corporation from making contributions to a state executive committee’s building fund account established under KRS

121.172

. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a not-for-profit corporation, which does not derive a substantial portion of its revenue from for-profit corporations, from making independent expenditures.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 179; 1980, ch. 292, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 458, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 153, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2017 ch. 122, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.

121.040.
Delivery
of proclamations and writs to sheriffs. [Repealed.]

121.045.
Contributions
to certain candidates or slates of candidates by individuals prohibited.

No person and no agent of any
person on his behalf, shall contribute, either directly or indirectly, any
money, service, or other thing of value towards the nomination or election
of any state, county, city, or district officer who, in his official capacity,
is required by law to perform any duties peculiar to the person not common
to the general public, or to supervise, regulate, or control in any manner
the affairs of the person, or to perform any duty in assessing the property
of the person for taxation. No person, and no agent of any person on his behalf,
shall pay, promise, loan, or become liable in any way for any money or other
valuable thing on behalf of any candidate or slate of candidates for any office
at any election, primary, or nominating convention held in this state. No
attorney or other person shall accept employment and compensation from any
person with the understanding or agreement, either direct or implied, that
he will contribute to any candidate or slate of candidates for any office,
or on his behalf, any part or all of his compensation, towards the nomination
or election of any candidate or slate of candidates.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 181; 1984, ch. 111, § 67, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 288, § 23, effective July 14, 1992.

121.050.
Publication
of proclamations and writs by sheriff. [Repealed.]

121.055.
Candidates
prohibited from making expenditure, loan, promise, agreement or contract as
to action when elected, in consideration for vote.

No candidate for nomination
or election to any state, county, city or district office shall expend, pay,
promise, loan or become liable in any way for money or other thing of value,
either directly or indirectly, to any person in consideration of the vote
or financial or moral support of that person. No such candidate shall promise,
agree or make a contract with any person to vote for or support any particular
individual, thing or measure, in consideration for the vote or the financial
or moral support of that person in any election, primary or nominating convention,
and no person shall require that any candidate make such a promise, agreement
or contract.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 182; 1980, ch. 292, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 111, § 68, effective July 13, 1984.

121.056.
Restrictions
upon specified campaign contributors.

No person who contributes more than the maximum legal contribution established by KRS

121.150

in any one (1) election to a slate of candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor that is elected to office shall hold any appointive state office or position, which shall be made by gubernatorial appointment, during the term of office following the campaign in which the contribution shall be made.

No person who has contributed more than the maximum legal contribution established by KRS

121.150

in any one (1) election to a slate of candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor that is elected to office or any entity in which such a person has a substantial interest shall have any contract with the Commonwealth of Kentucky during the term of office following the campaign in which the contributions shall be made unless the contract shall be attained by competitive bidding and the person or entity shall have the lowest and best bid.

“Substantial interest” means the person making the contribution owns or controls ten percent (10%) or more of an entity or a member of the person’s immediate family owns or controls ten percent (10%) of the entity or the person and his immediate family together own or control ten percent (10%) or more of the entity.

“Immediate family” means the spouse of the person, the parent of the person or spouse, or the child of the person or spouse.

No person shall give or conspire to contribute money or property to any other person for the purpose of making a campaign contribution, in violation of this section. The restrictions established by subsections (1) and (2) of this section to a person who shall contribute in excess of the maximum legal contribution established by KRS

121.150

in any one (1) election as provided by those subsections, shall apply to a person who makes a total contribution in excess of the maximum legal contribution established by KRS

121.150

in any one (1) election to a slate of candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor that is elected to office as provided by this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 118, § 1; 1991; 1992, ch. 288, § 24, effective July 14, 1992; 2005, ch. 105, § 3, effective March 16, 2005.

121.060.
Nominations
by political parties of candidates for special elections. [Repealed.]

121.065.
Limitation
of political advertising rates — Injunction.

No publisher of newspapers, magazines, handbills, or other printed matter, owner or lessor of billboards, radio or television station or network, or any other person, company, corporation, or organization offering its communications services for hire to the public shall be permitted to charge fees for political advertising in excess of the lowest rate charged to other advertisers at the time the political advertising is purchased.

Political advertising means any communication intended to support or defeat a candidate for public office.

An action to enjoin violations of this section shall be in the Circuit Court of the county where the complaining candidate resides.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 183; 1994, ch. 458, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

121.070.
Petitions,
certificates of nomination for General Assembly, congressional vacancies.
[Repealed.]